Washington statutes.
RCW 36.26.900

Chapter cumulative and nonexclusive.

The provisions of this chapter shall be cumulative and nonexclusive and shall not affect any other remedy, particularly in counties electing not to create the office of public defender: PROVIDED, That nothing herein shall be construed to prevent the appointment of a full time or part time assigned-counsel administrator for the purpose of maintaining a centrally administered system for the assignment of counsel to represent indigent persons.

[ 1969 c 94 s 10.]